Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,148
Entities eligible to receive assistance; matching funds; requirements; exception; applicability of section.

(1) Governmental subdivisions and Nebraska nonprofit organizations are eligible to receive assistance under the Site and Building Development Act. Any entity receiving assistance under subsection (1) of section 81-12,147 shall provide, or cause to be provided, matching funds for the eligible activity in an amount determined by the Department of Economic Development, which amount shall be at least equal to one hundred percent of the amount of assistance provided by the Site and Building Development Fund. Nothing in the act shall be construed to allow individuals or businesses to receive direct loans from the fund.

(2) An applicant for a grant for development of a public-private-partnership facility under subdivision (1)(h) of section 81-12,147 shall provide the Director of Economic Development with a letter of support from the United States Strategic Command prior to approval of the application and with proof of the availability of twenty million dollars in private or other funds for the facility. No funds shall be expended or grants awarded until receipt of proof of the availability of twenty million dollars in private or other funds for the facility and certification is provided by the Director of Economic Development to the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(3) An applicant for a grant for development under subdivision (1)(k) of section 81-12,147 is not required to meet the matching fund requirements pursuant to this section but shall provide the Director of Economic Development a letter from the United States Department of Defense or contractor providing upgrades to ground-based nuclear deterrence that infrastructure improvements, including the construction of electrical, drinking water, and clean water infrastructure, will not be included in the scope of the project. No grants shall be awarded or funds expended until such letter is received.

(4)(a) An applicant for a grant for construction of a golf facility under subdivision (1)(n) of section 81-12,147 shall, prior to approval of the application, provide the Director of Economic Development with:

(i) Documentation demonstrating the facility's programming for veterans;

(ii) Documentation demonstrating the facility's programming for youth;

(iii) A letter of support from a nationally accredited golf association;

(iv) A letter of support from a state accredited golf association;

(v) A letter of support from the mayor of the city of the metropolitan class where the facility will be located; and

(vi) Proof of funding for at least eighty percent of the total costs of the construction.

(b) A grant issued under this subsection shall not exceed twenty percent of the total costs of the construction.

(5) This section does not apply to any inland port authority receiving assistance under subsection (2) of section 81-12,147, an employer receiving assistance under subdivision (1)(o) of section 81-12,147, or a city receiving assistance under subdivision (1)(p) of section 81-12,147.

Laws 2011, LB388, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB156, § 16;

Laws 2022, LB1012, § 19;

Laws 2023, LB818, § 25;

Laws 2026, LB967, § 15;

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 26.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB967, section 15, with LB1165, section 26, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB967 became effective July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB1165 became operative April 17, 2026.